Washington statutes.
RCW 18.59.050

Licenses—Application—Requirements—Waiver.

(1) An applicant applying for a license as an occupational therapist or as an occupational therapy assistant shall file a written application on forms provided by the department showing to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant meets the requirements specified in this subsection.

(a) The applicant shall be of good moral character.

(b) The applicant shall present evidence satisfactory to the board of having successfully completed the academic requirements of an educational program in occupational therapy recognized by the board, with concentration in biological or physical science, psychology, sociology, and with education in selected manual skills.

(i) For an occupational therapist, such a program shall be nationally accredited and approved by rules of the board.

(ii) For an occupational therapy assistant, such a program shall be nationally accredited and approved by rules of the board.

(c) The applicant shall submit to the board evidence of having successfully completed a period of supervised fieldwork experience at a recognized educational institution or a training program approved by the educational institution at which the applicant met the academic requirements.

(i) For an occupational therapist, a minimum of six months of supervised fieldwork experience is required.

(ii) For an occupational therapy assistant, a minimum of two months of supervised fieldwork experience is required.

(d) An applicant for licensure as an occupational therapist or as an occupational therapy assistant shall pass an examination as provided in RCW 18.59.060.

(2) The board may waive the educational requirements specified under subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section for an occupational therapy assistant who has met the experience and any other requirements established by the board. Upon successful completion of the examination required of the occupational therapist, the individual shall be granted a license.

[ 1984 c 9 s 6.]